District of Columbia statutes.
38-2402.11

Authorization of appropriations.

(a)

Gallaudet University. —

There are authorized to be appropriated such sums as may be necessary for each of the fiscal years 1993 through 1997 to carry out the provisions of this chapter, relating to:

(1)

Gallaudet University;

(2)

Kendall Demonstration Elementary School; and

(3)

The model secondary school for individuals who are deaf.

(b)

National Technical Institute for the Deaf. —

There are authorized to be appropriated such sums as may be necessary for each of the fiscal years 1993 through 1997 to carry out the provisions of this chapter relating to the National Technical Institute for the Deaf.

Aug. 4, 1986, 100 Stat. 781, Pub. L. 99-371, § 411
renumbered as § 211, Oct. 1, 1992, 106 Stat. 2151, Pub. L. 102-421, §§ 101(b)(6), 140, 151(a)(4)
Aug. 11, 1993, 107 Stat. 735, Pub. L. 103-73, § 204(i)
1981 Ed., § 31-1842.11.